Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4602
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that innocent persons who have been wrongly convicted of crimes and
subsequently imprisoned have been uniquely victimized, have distinct problems
reentering society, and have difficulty achieving legal redress due to a variety
of substantive and technical obstacles in the law. The Legislature also finds
that such persons should have an available avenue of redress. In light of
the particular and substantial horror of being imprisoned for a crime one
did not commit, the Legislature intends by enactment of the Nebraska Claims
for Wrongful Conviction and Imprisonment Act that persons who can demonstrate
that they were wrongfully convicted shall have a claim against the state as
provided in the act.

Laws 2009, LB260, § 2.